California statutes. Public Resources Code
(3) If the commission issues an administrative permit for a project, rather than a coastal development permit, the local coastal administrator, other designee, or governing body, as the case may be, may object to the commission regarding the issuance of that permit.

(4) The applicant shall obtain all local noncoastal use permits in connection with the project. The approval of the commission’s coastal development permit shall be conditioned on the approval of the local noncoastal permits.

(5) The applicant shall transmit all complaints and comments from residents and business owners in connection with the filming activity to the commission for consideration prior to the approval of the application.

(6) The applicant shall obtain all other applicable permits required by state and federal jurisdictions in connection with the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 491, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

30610.91.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that designing and building complete streets that safely accommodate the needs of nonmotorized vehicles, pedestrians, and motorized vehicles in the coastal zone is preferred and encouraged.

(b) In order to expedite the provision of safe, nonvehicular travel within urbanized areas for the purpose of increasing recreational public access to the coast, limiting vehicle miles traveled, and reducing greenhouse gas emissions, an application by a local government to convert an existing motorized vehicle travel lane into a dedicated bicycle
 lane, dedicated transit lane, or a pedestrian walkway, shall not require a traffic study for the processing of either a coastal development permit or an amendment to a local coastal program.

(c) If a proposal to convert an existing motorized vehicle travel lane into a dedicated bicycle lane, dedicated transit lane, or a pedestrian walkway within the developed portion of an existing
 road right-of-way requires an amendment to a local coastal program, the amendment shall be processed pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 30514, if the executive director determines that, on balance, the project will provide additional public access benefits without significantly reducing existing public access opportunities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 445, Sec. 1.   (SB 689)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

30611.

When immediate action by a person or public agency performing a public service is required to protect life and public property from imminent danger, or to restore, repair, or maintain public works, utilities, or services destroyed, damaged, or interrupted by natural disaster, serious accident, or in other cases of emergency, the requirements of obtaining any permit under this division may be waived upon notification of the executive director of the commission of the type and location of the work within three days of the disaster or discovery of the danger, whichever occurs first. Nothing in this section authorizes permanent erection of structures valued at more than
 one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($125,000), adjusted annually for inflation pursuant to the consumer price index.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 118, Sec. 1.   (AB 584)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

30612.

An application for a coastal development permit to demolish a structure shall not be denied unless the agency authorized to issue that permit, or the commission, on appeal, where appeal is authorized by this division, finds, based on a preponderance of the evidence, that retention of that structure is feasible.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1173, Sec. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

30612.5.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The California coast is a unique and exceptional resource of international renown.

(2) The 2028 Olympic Games and Paralympic Games will provide an unparalleled opportunity to showcase the natural beauty of California, including its coast, to visitors and viewers from around the globe. The games will also provide a significant economic benefit to California’s coastal communities.

(3) Subdivision (i) of Section 30610 exempts from the requirements for a coastal development permit
 under this chapter any proposed development that the executive director finds to be a temporary event that does not have any significant adverse impact upon coastal resources. At the direction of the Legislature, the commission adopted guidelines to specify eligibility criteria for this exemption.

(4) The 2028 Olympic Games and Paralympic Games will include temporary development that is anticipated to exceed the eligibility criteria for exemption as a temporary event.

(5) Given the exceptional nature of the 2028 Olympic Games and Paralympic Games, it is necessary for the temporary development associated with the games to be deemed eligible for the exemption as temporary events.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (i) of Section 30610 and the guidelines adopted pursuant to that subdivision, all temporary development associated with holding the 2028 Olympic Games and Paralympic Games shall be considered temporary events that are exempt from the requirement for a local coastal development permit under this chapter.

(2) Paragraph (1) applies to all development, as that term is defined in Section 30106, that exists temporarily and is undertaken under the authority of the International Olympic Committee, the International Paralympic Committee, or the Los Angeles Organizing Committee for the 2028 Olympic and Paralympic Games as part of hosting, staging, and carrying out the 2028 Olympic Games and Paralympic Games, including, but not limited to, the temporary construction of physical structures, temporary restriction
 of access to public areas, and temporary modifications to vehicular parking. The exemption shall apply until the temporary development is removed, but in no case later than December 31, 2028.

(3) As part of showcasing the natural beauty of California and the overall environmental sustainability of the 2028 Olympic Games and Paralympic Games, temporary development described in paragraphs (1) and (2) shall, to the extent feasible, avoid and minimize significant impacts to coastal resources, including dune habitat areas, coastal wetlands, and public coastal access.

(4) Paragraph (1) does not apply to development that is undertaken under an authority other than that of the International Olympic Committee, the International Paralympic Committee, or the Los Angeles Organizing Committee
 for the 2028 Olympic and Paralympic Games.

(5) Paragraph (1) does not apply to development that is intended to last after December 31, 2028, including, but not limited to, public infrastructure upgrades that may be constructed in anticipation of the 2028 Olympic Games and Paralympic Games but will continue to serve the public after the completion of the games.

(c) The commission, through its executive director, and the Los Angeles Organizing Committee for the 2028 Olympic and Paralympic Games, shall coordinate on the planning and identification of all temporary events to be implemented consistent with this section.

(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of
 that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 106, Sec. 13.   (AB 149)   Effective September 17, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

30613.

(a) The provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 30519, subdivision (b) of Section 30600, and subdivision (b) of Section 30610.5, which apply to lands subject to the public trust shall not apply to any lands which may be subject to the public trust but which the commission, after consultation with the State Lands Commission, determines are (1) filled and developed and are (2) located within an area which is committed to urban uses.

(b) No later than 120 days after receiving a request from a local government, the commission shall determine the lands within the jurisdiction of that local government to which the provisions of subdivision (a) apply.

(c) The provisions of this section shall apply to lands which have been the subject of coastal development permits, local coastal programs, categorical exclusions or urban exclusions, which have previously been approved, authorized, or certified by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 43, Sec. 24.   Effective February 17, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

30614.

(a) The commission shall take appropriate steps to ensure that coastal development permit conditions existing as of January 1, 2002, relating to affordable housing are enforced and do not expire during the term of the permit.

(b) Nothing in this section is intended to retroactively authorize the release of any housing unit for persons and families of low or moderate income from coastal development permit requirements except as provided in Section 30607.2.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 297, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

30615.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “Event” means a competition event within the coastal zone.

(2) “Prize compensation” includes prize or purse money, other prizes, goods, or other compensation.

(b) The commission shall require as a condition of a coastal development permit for any event that awards prize compensation to competitors in gendered categories, for any participant level that
 receives prize compensation, that the prize compensation for each gendered category be identical at each participant level. The commission shall not approve a coastal development permit for an event that does not comply with this condition.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 276, Sec. 4.   (AB 467)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

30616.

(a) (1) The California Offshore Wind Energy Fisheries Working Group is hereby established. The working group shall be composed of representatives of the commission, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, the State Lands Commission, the Ocean Protection Council, representatives of the commercial and recreational fishing industries, the offshore wind energy industry, representatives of relevant federal agencies, representatives of California Native American tribes with affected tribal fisheries, and other stakeholders as appropriate, as determined by the commission.

(2) The number of representatives in the working group representing the commercial and recreational fishing industries, the offshore wind energy industry, California
 Native American tribes with affected tribal fisheries, and any other stakeholders included in the working group, as specified in paragraph (1), shall be determined by the commission.

(b) On or before January 1, 2025, the commission, in coordination with the Department of Fish and Wildlife, shall convene the working group for the purpose of developing a statewide strategy for ensuring that offshore wind energy projects avoid and minimize impacts to ocean fisheries to the maximum extent possible, avoid, minimize, and mitigate impacts to fishing and fisheries in a manner that prioritizes fishery productivity, viability, and long-term resilience, and fairly and reasonably compensate persons engaged in the commercial and recreational fishing industries and tribal fisheries for economic impacts to ocean fisheries resulting from offshore wind energy projects.

(c) The statewide strategy
 developed pursuant to this section shall include best practices for addressing impacts to the commercial and recreational fishing industries, tribal fisheries, and environmental resources associated with offshore wind energy projects, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) Protocols for communication among impacted parties.

(2) A methodology for a comprehensive project-level socioeconomic analysis of direct and indirect impacts to commercial and recreational fishing industries and tribal fisheries.

(3) Best practices for offshore surveys and data collection to assess impacts.

(4) Best practices for avoidance and minimization of impacts, including the use of evidence-informed adaptive management.

(5) A template for a fishing agreement that includes all relevant elements of the statewide strategy.

(6) A template for an agreement addressing tribal fishing interests that includes all relevant elements of the statewide strategy.

(7) (A) A framework for reasonable compensatory mitigation for unavoidable impacts to the commercial and recreational fishing industries and tribal fisheries.

(B) The framework for reasonable compensatory mitigation shall include a payment structure to reasonably compensate commercial, tribal, and recreational fisheries and impacted commercial fish processors for unavoidable impacts associated with offshore wind energy projects, including for all of the following:

(i) Investments in fleet improvements to promote resiliency.

(ii) Reasonable compensation for the commercial fishing industry for personal property losses caused by offshore wind energy projects. The working group shall ensure that payments for purposes of this clause provide sufficient funds for the entire lifetime of the offshore wind energy project to reasonably compensate the commercial fishing industry for all lost personal property.

(iii) Reasonable compensation for lost commercial and tribal revenue due to reduced fishing grounds.

(iv) Funding for robust monitoring and evaluation of offshore wind turbines and their impact on fisheries and the surrounding environment.

(v) A proportionate
 amount from each lessee that is sufficient to cover state costs pursuant to this section, including, but not limited to, the costs of the working group’s activities and other administrative expenses.

(8) A recognition of locally negotiated agreements between the fishing industry and offshore wind energy leaseholders.

(d) (1) The working group shall complete the statewide strategy, including the framework for reasonable compensatory mitigation for unavoidable impacts, on or before January 1, 2026.

(2) The commission shall review for consistency with Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 30200), modify as necessary, and adopt, the statewide strategy, including the framework for reasonable compensatory mitigation for unavoidable impacts, on or before May 1, 2026.

(3) (A) An applicant seeking approval or concurrence from a state agency for an offshore wind energy project shall comply with the terms, recommendations, and best practices established in the statewide strategy, as adopted by the commission.

(B) The commission shall ensure that the terms, recommendations, and best practices established in the statewide strategy, as adopted by the commission, are implemented.

(4) The commission shall review the statewide strategy as needed to determine if any changes are necessary. At a regularly noticed public hearing, the commission shall present the outcome of any review pursuant to this paragraph and may, by resolution, authorize the reconvening of the working group.

(e) Representatives of the
 commercial fishing industry, recreational fishing industry, and California Native American tribes who participate in the working group shall be compensated for expenses reasonably incurred for approved working group activities, including attendance at meetings, at a rate of fifty dollars ($50) per hour, up to no more than five hundred dollars ($500) per day. Representatives of the commercial fishing industry, recreational fishing industry, and California Native American tribes may also receive reimbursement for reasonable travel expenses. Funds used to compensate representatives of the commercial fishing industry, recreational fishing industry, and California Native American tribes pursuant to this subdivision shall be paid from the Offshore Wind Energy Resiliency Fund to the extent funds are available pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 7100.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 386, Sec. 4.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

30617.

As part of the commission’s federal consistency process, when reviewing a workforce development plan submitted to the federal Bureau of Ocean Energy Management consistent with conditions 5 and 6 of the commission’s Consistency Determination CD-0001-22 and Consistency Determination CD-0004-22 and existing statutory requirements, the commission shall consult with representatives of labor organizations for the construction trades and maritime and longshore workforce in furtherance of providing for career and workforce training and retraining for individuals whose livelihoods are disrupted by the development of offshore wind energy projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 386, Sec. 5.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Development Control Procedures [30620. - 30627.]

30620.

(a) By January 30, 1977, the commission shall, consistent with this chapter, prepare interim procedures for the submission, review, and appeal of coastal development permit applications and of claims of exemption. These procedures shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Application and appeal forms.

(2) Reasonable provisions for notification to the commission and other interested persons of an action taken by a local government pursuant to this chapter, in sufficient detail to ensure that a preliminary review of that action for conformity with this chapter can be made.

(3) Interpretive guidelines designed to
 assist local governments, the commission, and persons subject to this chapter in determining how the policies of this division shall be applied in the coastal zone before the certification, and through the preparation and amendment, of local coastal programs. However, the guidelines shall not supersede, enlarge, or diminish the powers or authority of the commission or any other public agency.

(b) No later than May 1, 1977, the commission shall, after public hearing, adopt permanent procedures that include the components specified in subdivision (a) and shall transmit a copy of those procedures to each local government within the coastal zone and make them readily available to the public. After May 1, 1977, the commission may, from time to time, and, except in cases of emergency, after public hearing, modify or adopt additional procedures or guidelines that the commission determines to be necessary to better carry out the purposes of this
 division.

(c) (1) The commission may require a reasonable filing fee and the reimbursement of expenses for the processing by the commission of an application for a coastal development permit under this division and, except for local coastal program submittals, for any other filing, including, but not limited to, a request for revocation, categorical exclusion, or boundary adjustment, that is submitted for review by the commission.

(2) A coastal development permit fee that is collected by the commission under paragraph (1) shall be deposited in the Coastal Act Services Fund established pursuant to Section 30620.1. This paragraph does not authorize an increase in fees or create any new authority on the part of the commission.

(3) (A) The commission may waive the filing fee for an application for a coastal development permit
 or permit amendment required under this division.

(B) When considering a request for a waiver of a filing fee pursuant to this paragraph, the commission shall give extra consideration to a private nonprofit organization that qualifies for tax-exempt status under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code if the permit is required for a habitat restoration project or a project to provide public access to coastal resources.

(C) When the commission waives the filing fee for an application
 for a coastal development permit or permit amendment for a project meeting the criteria in subparagraph (B), the commission may specify whether the waiver also applies to future applications for an amendment to the permit.

(d) With respect to an appeal of an action taken by a local government pursuant to Section 30602 or 30603, the executive director shall, within five working days of receipt of an appeal from a person other than a member of the commission or a public agency, determine whether the appeal is patently frivolous. If the executive director determines that an appeal is patently frivolous, the appeal shall not be filed unless a filing fee in the amount of three hundred dollars ($300) is deposited with the commission within five working days of the receipt of the executive director’s determination. If the commission subsequently finds that the appeal raises a substantial issue, the filing fee shall be
 refunded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 102, Sec. 8.   (SB 856)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

30620.1.

(a) The Coastal Act Services Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury, to be administered by the commission. The moneys in the fund, upon appropriation by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act, shall be expended by the commission in accordance with this chapter to enforce the California Coastal Act and to provide services to local government, permit applicants, public agencies, and the public participating in the implementation of this division.

(b) Five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), adjusted annually by the application of the California Consumer Price Index for Urban Consumers as determined by the Department of Industrial Relations pursuant to Section 2212 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, shall be transferred annually from the Coastal Act Services Fund to the Coastal Access Account established pursuant to Section 30620.2.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 760, Sec. 17.   Effective September 30, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

30620.2.

The Coastal Access Account is hereby created in the State Coastal Conservancy Fund. The money in the account shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act, to the State Coastal Conservancy for grants to public agencies and private nonprofit entities or organizations for the development, maintenance, and operation of new or existing facilities that provide public access to the shoreline of the sea, as defined in Section 30115. Any grant funds that are not expended for those purposes shall revert to the account.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 760, Sec. 18.   Effective September 30, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

30620.5.

(a) A local government may exercise the option provided in subdivision (b) of Section 30600, if it does so for the entire area of its jurisdiction within the coastal zone and after it establishes procedures for the issuance of coastal development permits. Such procedures shall incorporate, where applicable, the interpretive guidelines issued by the commission pursuant to Section 30620.

(b) If a local government elects to exercise the option provided in subdivision (b) of Section 30600, the local government shall, by resolution adopted by the governing body of such local government, notify the commission and shall take appropriate steps to assure that the public is properly notified of such action. The provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 30600 shall take effect and shall be exercised by the local government on the 10th working day after the date on which the resolution required by this subdivision is adopted.

(c) Every local government exercising the option provided in subdivision (b) of Section 30600 or acting on coastal development permits prior to certification of its local coastal program pursuant to Sections 30520, 30600.5, and 30624, shall within five working days notify the commission and any person who, in writing, has requested such notification, in the manner prescribed by the commission pursuant to Section 30600.5 or 30620, of any coastal development permit it issues. 

(d) Within five working days of receipt of the notice required by subdivision (c), the executive director of the commission shall post, at a conspicuous location in the commission’s office, a description of the coastal development permit issued by the local government. Within 15 working days of receipt of such notice, the executive director shall, in the manner prescribed by the commission pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 30620, provide notice of the locally issued coastal development permit to members of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1173, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

30620.6.

The commission shall, not later than August 1, 1978, and after public hearing, adopt public notice and appeal procedures for the review of development projects appealable pursuant to Sections 30603 and 30715. The commission shall send copies of such procedures to every local government within the coastal zone and shall make them readily available to the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30621.

(a) The commission shall provide for a de novo public hearing on applications for coastal development permits and any appeals brought pursuant to this division and shall give to any affected person a written public notice of the nature of the proceeding and of the time and place of the public hearing. Notice shall also be given to any person who requests, in writing, such notification. A hearing on any coastal development permit application or an appeal shall be set no later than 49 working days after the date on which the application or appeal is filed with the commission.

(b) An appeal that is properly submitted shall be considered to be
 filed when any of the following occurs:

(1) The executive director determines that the appeal is not patently frivolous pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 30620.

(2) The five-day period for the executive director to determine whether an appeal is patently frivolous pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 30620 expires without that determination.

(3) The appellant pays the filing fee within the five-day period set forth in subdivision (d) of Section 30620.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 546, Sec. 30.   (SB 1473)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

30622.

The commission shall act upon the coastal development permit application or an appeal within 21 days after the conclusion of the hearing pursuant to Section 30621.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 285, Sec. 39.)
-------------------------------------------

30623.

If an appeal of any action on any development by any local government or port governing body is filed with the commission, the operation and effect of that action shall be stayed pending a decision on appeal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 285, Sec. 40.)
-------------------------------------------

30624.

(a) The commission shall provide, by regulation, for the issuance of coastal development permits by the executive director of the commission or, where the coastal development permit authority has been delegated to a local government pursuant to Section 30600.5, by an appropriate local official designated by resolution of the local government without compliance with the procedures specified in this chapter in cases of emergency, other than an emergency provided for under Section 30611, and for the following nonemergency developments: improvements to any existing structure; any single-family dwelling; any development of four dwelling units or less within any incorporated area that does not require demolition; any other developments not in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) other than any division of land; and any development specifically authorized as a principal permitted use and proposed in an area for which the land use portion of the applicable local coastal program has been certified. Such permit for nonemergency development shall not be effective until after reasonable public notice and adequate time for the review of such issuance has been provided.

(b) If one-third of the appointed members of the commission so request at the first meeting following the issuance of such permit by the executive director, such issuance shall not be effective, and, instead, the application shall be processed in accordance with the commission’s procedures for permits and pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

(c) Any permit issued by a local official pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be scheduled on the agenda of the governing body of the local agency at its first scheduled meeting after that permit has been issued. If, at that meeting, one-third of the members of that governing body so request, the permit issued by the local official shall not go into effect and the application for a coastal development permit shall be processed by the local government pursuant to Section 30600.5.

(d) No monetary limitations shall be required for emergencies covered by the provisions of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 43, Sec. 25.   Effective February 17, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

30624.7.

The commission may, after a public hearing, by regulation, adopt procedures for the issuance by the executive director of waivers from coastal development permit requirements for any development that is de minimis. A proposed development is de minimis if the executive director determines that it involves no potential for any adverse effect, either individually or cumulatively, on coastal resources and that it will be consistent with the policies of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 30200).

A waiver shall not take effect until it has been reported to the commission at the regularly scheduled meeting following its issuance by the executive director. If one-third of the appointed membership of the commission so request, at this meeting, such issuance shall not be effective and, instead, an application for a coastal development permit shall be required and processed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 43, Sec. 26.   Effective February 17, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

30624.9.

(a) For purposes of this section, “minor development” means a development which a local government determines satisfies all of the following requirements:

(1) Is consistent with the certified local coastal program, as defined in Section 30108.6.

(2) Requires no discretionary approvals other than a coastal development permit.

(3) Has no adverse effect either individually or cumulatively on coastal resources or public access to the shoreline or along the coast.

(b) After certification of its local coastal program, a local government may waive the requirement for a public hearing on a coastal development permit application for a minor development only if both of the following occur:

(1) Notice that a public hearing shall be held upon request by any person is provided to all persons who would otherwise be required to be notified of a public hearing as well as any other persons known to be interested in receiving notice.

(2) No request for public hearing is received by the local government within 15 working days from the date of sending the notice pursuant to paragraph (1).

(c) The notice provided pursuant to subdivision (b) shall include a statement that failure by a person to request a public hearing may result in the loss of that person’s ability to appeal to the commission any action taken by a local government on a coastal development permit application.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 669, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

30625.

(a) Except as otherwise specifically provided in Section 30602, any appealable action on a coastal development permit or claim of exemption for any development by a local government or port governing body may be appealed to the commission by an applicant, any aggrieved person, or any two members of the commission. The commission may approve, modify, or deny the proposed development, and if no action is taken within the time limit specified in Sections 30621 and 30622, the decision of the local government or port governing body, as
 the case may be, shall become final, unless the time limit in Section 30621 or 30622 is waived by the applicant.

(b) The commission shall hear an appeal unless it determines the following:

(1) With respect to appeals pursuant to Section 30602, that no substantial issue exists as to conformity with Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 30200).

(2) With respect to appeals to the commission after certification of a local coastal program, that no substantial issue exists with respect to the grounds on which an appeal has been filed pursuant to Section 30603.

(3) With respect to appeals to the commission after certification of a port master plan, that no
 substantial issue exists as to conformity with the certified port master plan.

(c) Decisions of the commission, where applicable, shall guide local governments or port governing bodies in their future actions under this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 102, Sec. 9.   (SB 856)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

30626.

The commission may, by regulation, provide for the reconsideration of the terms and conditions of any coastal development permit granted by the commission solely for the purpose of correcting any information contained in those terms and conditions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 285, Sec. 42.)
-------------------------------------------

30627.

(a) The commission shall, by regulation, provide procedures which the commission shall use in deciding whether to grant reconsideration of any of the following: 

(1) Any decision to deny an application for a coastal development permit. 

(2) Any term or condition of a coastal development permit which has been granted. 

(b) The procedures required by subdivision (a) shall include at least the following provisions: 

(1) Only an applicant for a coastal development permit shall be eligible to request reconsideration. 

(2) The request for reconsideration shall be made within 30 days of the decision on the application for a coastal development permit. 

(3) The basis of the request for reconsideration shall be either that there is relevant new evidence which, in the exercise of reasonable diligence, could not have been presented at the hearing on the matter or that an error of fact or law has occurred which has the potential of altering the initial decision. 

(4) The commission shall have the discretion to grant or deny requests for reconsideration. 

(c) A decision to deny a request for reconsideration is not subject to appeal. 

(d) This section shall not alter any right otherwise provided by this division to appeal an action ; provided, that a request for reconsideration shall be made only once for any one development application, and shall, for purposes of any time limits specified in Sections 30621 and 30622, be considered a new application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 285, Sec. 43.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Ports [30700. - 30721.]



  ARTICLE 1. Findings and General Provisions [30700. - 30701.]

30700.

For purposes of this division, notwithstanding any other provisions of this division except as specifically stated in this chapter, this chapter shall govern those portions of the Ports of Hueneme, Long Beach, Los Angeles, and San Diego Unified Port District located within the coastal zone, but excluding any wetland, estuary, or existing recreation area indicated in Part IV of the coastal plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 384.)
-------------------------------------------

30700.5.

The definitions of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 30100) and the provisions of Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 30800) and Section 30900 shall apply to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30701.

The Legislature finds and declares that:

(a) The ports of the State of California, including the Humboldt Bay Harbor, Recreation, and Conservation District, constitute one of the state’s primary economic and coastal resources and are an essential element of the national maritime industry.

(b) The location of the commercial port districts within the State of California, including the Humboldt Bay Harbor, Recreation, and Conservation District, are well established, and for many years such areas have been devoted to transportation and commercial, industrial, and manufacturing uses consistent with federal, state, and local regulations. Coastal planning requires no change in the number or
 location of the established commercial port districts. Existing ports, including the Humboldt Bay Harbor, Recreation, and Conservation District, should be encouraged to modernize and construct necessary facilities within their boundaries in order to minimize or eliminate the necessity for future dredging and filling to create new ports in new areas of the state.

(c) Existing ports, including the Humboldt Bay Harbor, Recreation, and Conservation District, should be encouraged to pursue development that contributes to the construction and deployment of offshore wind energy generation facilities, consistent with the policies of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 292, Sec. 5.   (SB 704)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Policies [30702. - 30708.]

30702.

For purposes of this division, the policies of the state with respect to providing for port-related developments consistent with coastal protection in the port areas to which this chapter applies, which require no commission permit after certification of a port master plan and which, except as provided in Section 30715, are not appealable to the commission after certification of a master plan, are set forth in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1331.)
-------------------------------------------

30703.

The California commercial fishing industry is important to the State of California; therefore, ports shall not eliminate or reduce existing commercial fishing harbor space, unless the demand for commercial fishing facilities no longer exists or adequate alternative space has been provided. Proposed recreational boating facilities within port areas shall, to the extent it is feasible to do so, be designed and located in such a fashion as not to interfere with the needs of the commercial fishing industry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30705.

(a) Water areas may be diked, filled, or dredged when consistent with a certified port master plan only for the following:

(1) Construction, deepening, widening, lengthening, or maintenance of ship channel approaches, ship channels, turning basins, berthing areas, and facilities that are required for the safety and the accommodation of commerce and vessels to be served by port facilities.

(2) New or expanded facilities or waterfront land for port-related facilities. 

(3) New or expanded commercial fishing facilities or recreational boating facilities.

(4) Incidental public service purposes, including, but not limited to, burying cables or pipes or inspection of piers and maintenance of existing intake and outfall lines.

(5) Mineral extraction, including sand for restoring beaches, except in biologically sensitive areas.